District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COlJNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLlJ~L~, Th1t this
20 act may be cited as the '~O~nm~: of Street~, Designation of Op,ened Streets, and Closing ofa
21 Portion of a Street in Square 1112-E Ad of 2026'.
22 Sec. 2. Nohvithsw,dmg the prov".is:ions of the Street and Alley Closing and.Acquisition
25 (a) Approves the improvement and opening of the streeti in Square 1112-E shovn1 on the
26 Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. File 23-0156 and S.O. File 24_;04415;
27 (b) Designates. the streets opened pursuant to _subsection (a) of this section as 20th Street,
2& S.E.~2 bt Street, S.E.~B urke Street, S.K, 20thPlacel S.E., 21fd:Place, S.E., C Place S.R, and C
1
29 Street, S.E.l' as sb.o~~n on the Surveyor's,p lat filed under S.O. File 23-0156 md S.O. File 24-
30 04415;and.
31 (c) Approves. the dosmgofaportionof20th Street, S.K in Square 1112-E, as, sho~m on
32 the SlllfVeyor's plats filed undM S.O~F ile 23-0156 a:nd S.O. File 24-04415.

33 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
34 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
35 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
36 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat, 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
37 Sec. 4. Effective date.
38 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
39 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
40 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
41 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
42 Columbia Register.

INDEPENDENCE AVENUE, S.E.
KRAP
AITSOCANA
E STREET, S.E.
.E.S
,TEERTS
ht91
817
823
809
BURKE STREET, S.E.
808
P.T.
TOTAL PUBLIC
C STREET, S.E. STREET OPENED
295,506 SF
6.7839 AC.
E
S.
T,
M E
A E
S R
S
A T A C S
V H H
E N U E U S E T 2 0 T
,
S
T
S
.E
.
826
P.C.
P .T.
518
810
821
824
811
818
825
827
618
827
821
822
25.891~HTRON
WEST~351.98
107.86
HTRON
EAST~351.98
HTRON
0.412~HTRON
EAST~112.26
17.792~HTRON
EAST
17.792~HTUOS
EAST~259.72
0.834~HTRON
EAST
0.834~HTUOS
WEST~160.0
0.791~HTUOS
WEST~257.51
SOUTH~100.04
P.T.
'87
'09
128
80'
80'
'58
80'
80'
75'
78'
'87
'09
806
508
'08
'001
75'
75'
80'
80'
'58
EAST~493.48
WEST~428.90
0.792~HTUOS
WEST~115.0
0.592~HTUOS
EAST~234.25
WEST~314.25
0.512~HTRON
EAST~160.0
0.791~HTRON
P.C. P.C.
SEE DETAIL
92.041 92.041
HTRON
336.98 120.0 40.0 378.48
313.98
217.51 40.0
63.61
'58 828
50.42
807
HTRON 09.831
09.322
R=1050.0
A=229.97
Δ=12°32'56"
1,808 SF
A PORTION OF 20TH STREET,
S.E. TO BE CLOSED AND REVERT
TO LOT 825
820 822
WEST~63.61
819
0"
R =
1 6 5. 0
A = 7
9. 1 0
Δ = 2
7° 2 8' 0
E
S.
T,
E
E R
T
S
H
T
0 2
39.56
~
HTUOS
78'
P.C.
21.79~HTRON
EAST~16.39
SOUTH~65.93
A PORTION OF 20TH STREET,
S.E. TO BE CLOSED AND REVERT
R=245.0 P.T. A=49.36
R=159.0 Δ=11°32'40" A=43.24
Δ=15°34'48" 2 12.11
2
N62°32'00"W~1.84 ~
9.
N03°16'22"E
E
2"
5
6'
0
1°
0 N
40.001
EAST~14.39
'09
84.89
'08
14.39
HTRON
HTRON
1,440 SF
1,670 SF
40.001
821
11.83
8.63
40.001
PUBLIC STREETS OPENED
PURSUANT TO D.C. LAW___________________ EFFECTIVE__________________,
AND A PORTION OF PUBLIC
THE STREETS SHOWN THUS: ARE HEREBY OPENED
A PORTION OF 20TH STREET SHOWN THUS: ARE HEREBY CLOSED
STREET CLOSED
UPON RECORDATION OF THIS PLAT.
LOTS 816, 819, 820, 821, AND 827
NOTE: STREETS SHOWN HEREON ARE OPENED FOR MUNICIPAL PURPOSES
CONTINGENT ON DDOT ACCEPTANCE.
SQUARE 1112 - E
Office of the Surveyor, D.C.
, 2024
I certify that the plat shown herein is correct and is recorded.
Surveyor, D.C.
1,808 SF
TO LOT 825
SURVEYOR'S OFFICE, D.C.
Made for: MATTHEW HULL
Drawn by: A.S. Checked by:
Record and computations by: B. MYERS
Recorded at:
Recorded in Book Page SR-23-01560
SR-24-04415
Scale: 1 inch = 150 feet
NOT TO SCALE
2024/STREET_DEDICATION/SR-23-01560, SR-24-04415-SQ.1112- E

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: April 15, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Opening of Streets, Closing of a Portion of a
Street and Designation of Opened Streets in Square 1112-E, Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 9,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The bill authorizes the Mayor to establish and designate seven new street segments in the Hill East
neighborhood of the District. The bill extends eastward Burke Street, S.E.1 for approximately three
blocks and C Street, S.E.2 for approximately two blocks from their current terminus just west of the
planned 20th Street, S.E. The bill extends 20th Street, S.E.3 approximately one- and one-half blocks
northward from its current terminus just north of Massachusetts Avenue, S.E. The bill establishes
three new north to south roadways. The bill establishes 20th Place, S.E.4 and 21st Place, S.E.5 from the
newly extended C Street, S.E. to the newly extended Burke Street, S.E. The bill also establishes 21st
Street, S.E.6 from approximately Massachusetts Avenue, S.E. to Independence Avenue, S.E. Finally, the
1 Known for assessment and tax purposes as portions of Lots 821 and 827 in Square 1112-E.
2 Known for assessment and tax purposes as portions of Lots 821 and 827 in Square 1112-E.
3 Known for assessment and tax purposes as portions of Lots 816 and 821 in Square 1112-E.
4 Known for assessment and tax purposes as a portion of Lot 821 in Square 1112-E.
5 Known for assessment and tax purposes as a portion of Lot 827 in Square 1112-E.
6 Known for assessment and tax purposes as portions of lots 821 and 827 in Square 1112-E.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Opening of Streets, Closing of a Portion of a Street and Designation of Opened Streets in Square 1112-E,
Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as Provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 9, 2026
bill establishes C Place, S.E.7 from 20th Street, S.E. just north of Massachusetts Avenue, S.E. eastward
to the starting point of the newly established 21st Street, S.E.
The bill also proposes to close an approximately 1,800 square foot segment of 20th Street, S.E. along
the east side of the existing roadway north of newly established C Place, S.E.
The build-out and designation of these roadways will support the development of properties
disposed for private development in 2022.8
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The Department of General Services will build
out the new street segments through funding provided by the Deputy Mayor for Planning and
Economic Development (DMPED). DMPED’s Hill East project includes over $62 million over the
proposed fiscal year 2026 to fiscal year 2032 capital improvements plan to support infrastructure
development in the Hill East neighborhood. DGS expects to complete the street segments by the end
of 2028. Once the streets are complete, the District Department of Transportation (DDOT) will
assume control and be responsible for ongoing maintenance. DDOT anticipates that the full roadways
will require maintenance every five years, with the first scheduled maintenance expected around
2034.9
7 Known for assessment and tax purposes as a portion of Lot 827 in Square 1112-E.
8 Hill East Phase II Bundle 2 Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of 2022, effective March 10,
2023 (D.C. Law 24-322; 70 DCR 3553).
9 DDOT estimates that the cost of maintenance will be around $1 million for these roadways.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 25, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Bill, the “Opening of Streets, Closing of a Portion
of a Street, and Designation of Opened Streets in Square 1112-E Act of 2026” (AE-26-
211)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov